Mwapo.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Liv +Stat +Abstr +Nom +Acc +Dat +Gen
+V +Phys +Mov +Spir +Life +Past +Pres +Fut +RemPast
+Perf +Imperf +Habit

! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
 mwapo N ;
 buri N ;
 vuuv N ;
 qquu N ;
 ttifo N ;
 san N ;
 linel N ;
 dih N ;
 hewi N ;
 puuluuv N ;
 atto V;
 gol V;
 sum V;
 appa V;
 qolush V;
 loq V;
 potu V;
 liq V;
 fi'iqo V;
 imuru V;

! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
LEXICON N
+N: N-class ;

! Lexicon containing noun class suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON N-class
+Liv:u  N-case ;
+Stat:  N-case ;
+Abstr:a N-case ;

! Lexicon containing noun case suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON N-case
+Nom:  #  ;
+Acc:ti  # ;
+Dat:tla # ;
+Gen:qo  # ;

! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
LEXICON V
+V: V-class ;

! Lexicon containing verb class suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON V-class
+Phys:o  Tense ;
+Mov:i  Tense ;
+Spir:a Tense ;
+Life:u Tense ;

! Lexicon containing tense suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON Tense
+Pres:  Aspect ;
+Past:si  Aspect ;
+RemPast:hi Aspect ;
+Fut:vi  Aspect ;

! Lexicon containing aspect suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON Aspect
+Imperf: # ;
+Perf:d # ;
+Habit:b # ;

! I listed 10 nouns, each of which can be put into one of 3 fluid classes
! (they can have different classes depending on how they're being used) and
! one of 4 cases (12 possible inflectional forms). 
! The format for lookup is root+N+class+case.
! Roots: mwapo, buri, vuuv, qquu, ttifo, san, linel, dih, hewi, puuluuv
! Classes: +Liv (living), +Stat (static), +Abstr (abstract)
! Cases: +Nom +Acc +Dat +Gen
! Examples: mwapo+N+Liv+Acc = mwapouti
!           qquu+N+Abstr+Gen = qquuaqo
!           linel+N+Stat+Dat = lineltla
! I also listed 10 verbs with 4 fluid classes, 4 tenses, and 3 aspects.
! The format for lookup is root+V+class+tense+aspect.
! Roots: atto, gol, sum, appa, qolush, loq, potu, liq, fi'iqo, imuru
! Classes: +Phys (physical), +Mov (movement), +Spir (spiritual), +Life (life)
! Tenses: +Pres, +Past, +Fut, +RemPast (remote/literary past)
! Aspects: +Perf, +Imperf, +Habit (habitual)
